Oklahoma, session 2025, SB38.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1353, as
last amended by Section 4, Chapter 441, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1353), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1353. A. It is hereby declared to be the purpose of
the Oklahoma Sales Tax Code to provide funds for the financing of
the program provided for by the Oklahoma Social Security Act and to
provide revenues for the support of the functions of the state
government of Oklahoma, and for this purpose it is hereby expressly
provided that, revenues derived pursuant to the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sales Tax Code, subject to the apportionment requirements
for the Oklahoma Tax Commission and Office of Management and
Enterprise Services Joint Computer Enhancement Fund provided by
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Sect ion 265 of this title, and further subject to the apportionment
requirement provided in subsection D of this section, shall be
apportioned as follows:
1. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, the
following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be placed
to the credit of the General Revenue Fund to be paid out pursuant to
direct appropriation by the Legislature:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2003 and FY 2004 86.04%
FY 2005 85.83%
FY 2006 85.54%
FY 2007 85.04%
FY 2008 through FY 2022 83.61%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 83.36%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 83.61%;
2. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Education Reform Revolving Fund of
the State Department of Education:
a. for FY 2003, FY 2004 and FY 2005, ten and forty-two
one-hundredths percent (10.42%),
b. for FY 2006 through FY 2020, ten and forty-six one-
hundredths percent (10.46%),
c. for FY 2021:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(1) for the month beginning July 1, 2020, through the
month ending August 31, 2020, ten and forty-six
one-hundredths percent (10.46%), and
(2) for the month beginning September 1, 2020,
through the month ending June 30, 2021, eleven
and ninety-six one-hundredths percent (11.96%),
and
d. for FY 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, ten and
forty-six one-hundredths percent (10.46%);
3. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Teachers’ Retirement System
Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2003 and FY 2004 3.54%
FY 2005 3.75%
FY 2006 4.0%
FY 2007 4.5%
FY 2008 through FY 2020 5.0%
FY 2021:
a. for the month beginning July
1, 2020, through the month
ending August 31, 2020 5.0%
b. for the month beginning
September 1, 2020, through
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the month ending June 30,
2021 3.5%
FY 2022 5.0%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 5.25%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 5.0%;
4. a. except as otherwise provided in subparagraph b of this
paragraph, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2022,
and for each fiscal year thereafter, eighty-seven one-
hundredths percent (0.87%) shall be paid to the State
Treasurer to be further apportioned as follows:
(1) twenty-four percent (24%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed Five Million Dollars
($5,000,000.00) in any fiscal year,
(2) forty-four percent (44%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Capital
Improvement Revolving Fund, but in no event shall
such apportionment exceed Nine Million Dollars
($9,000,000.00) in any fiscal year, and
(3) thirty-two percent (32%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Route 66 Commission
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed Six Million Six Hundred
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Thousand Dollars ($6,600,000.00) in any fiscal
year, and
b. any amounts which exceed the limitations of
subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be placed to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund; and
5. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, and for each
fiscal year thereafter fiscal years 2016 through 2025, six one-
hundredths percent (0.06%) shall be placed to the credit of the
Oklahoma Historical Society Capital Improvement and Operations
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such apportionment exceed the
total amount apportioned pursuant to this paragraph for the fiscal
year ending on June 30, 2015. For fiscal year 2026 and subsequent
fiscal years, six one-hundredths percent (0.06%) shall be placed to
the credit of the Oklahoma Historical Society Capital Improvement
and Operations Revolving Fund, but in no event shall the
apportionment exceed One Million Eight Hundred Eighty Thousand Five
Hundred Fifty-three Dollars and twenty-five cents ($1,880,553.25).
Any amounts which exceed the limitations of this paragraph shall be
placed to the credit of the General Revenue Fund.
B. Provided, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007, and
every fiscal year thereafter, an amount of revenue shall be
apportioned to each municipality or county which levies a sales tax
subject to the provisions of Section 1357.10 of this title and
subsection F of Section 2701 of this title equal to the amount of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

sale s tax revenue of such municipality or county exempted by the
provisions of Section 1357.10 of this title and subsection F of
Section 2701 of this title. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall
promulgate and adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of
this subsection.
C. From the monies that would otherwise be apportioned to the
General Revenue Fund pursuant to subsection A of this section, there
shall be apportioned the following amounts:
1. For the month ending August 31, 2019:
a. Nine Million Six Hundred Thousand Dollars
($9,600,000.00) to the credit of the State Highway
Construction and Maintenance Fund created in Section
1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
2. For the month ending September 30, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
3. For the month ending October 31, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
4. For the month ending November 30, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund
created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
5. For the month ending December 31, 2019:
a. Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) to the credit
of the State Highway Construction and Maintenance Fund

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

created in Section 1501 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, and
b. Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to the credit of
the Oklahoma Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund
created in Section 309 of Title 66 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
D. For fiscal year 2029, and each subsequent fiscal year, Fifty
Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) shall be placed to the credit of
the Oklahoma Capital Assets Maintenance and Protection Fund created
in Section 2 188B of this act Title 73 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1403, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1403. A. It is hereby declared to be the purpose of
Section 1401 et seq. of this title to provide for the support of the
functions of the state and local government of Oklahoma; and for
this purpose and to this end, it is hereby expressly provided that
the revenues derived hereunder, subject to the apportionment
provided in subsection B of this section and to the apportionment
requirements for the Oklahoma Tax Commission and Office of
Management and Enterprise Services Joint Computer Enhancement Fund
provided by Section 265 of this title, are hereby apportioned as
follows:
1. The following amounts shall be paid by the Tax Commission to
the State Treasurer and placed to the credit of the General Revenue
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Fund to be paid out pursuant to direct appropriation by the
Legislature:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2004 85.35%
FY 2005 85.14%
FY 2006 85.54%
FY 2007 85.04%
FY 2008 through FY 2022 83.61%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 83.36%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 83.61%;
2. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Education Reform Revolving Fund of
the State Department of Education:
a. for FY 2020, ten and forty-six one-hundredths percent
(10.46%),
b. for FY 2021:
(1) for the month beginning July 1, 2020, through the
month ending August 31, 2020, ten and forty-six
one-hundredths percent (10.46%), and
(2) for the month beginning September 1, 2020,
through the month ending June 30, 2021, eleven
and ninety-six one-hundredths percent (11.96%),
and

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. for FY 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, ten and
forty-six one-hundredths percent (10.46%);
3. The following amounts shall be paid to the State Treasurer
to be placed to the credit of the Teachers’ Retirement System
Dedicated Revenue Revolving Fund:
Fiscal Year Amount
FY 2003 and FY 2004 3.54%
FY 2005 3.75%
FY 2006 4.0%
FY 2007 4.5%
FY 2008 through FY 2020 5.0%
FY 2021:
a. for the month beginning July
1, 2020, through the month
ending August 31, 2020 5.0%
b. for the month beginning
September 1, 2020, through
the month ending June 30,
2021 3.5%
FY 2022 5.0%
FY 2023 through FY 2027 5.25%
FY 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter 5.0%;
4. a. except as otherwise provided in subparagraph b of this
paragraph, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and for each fiscal year thereafter, eighty-seven one-
hundredths percent (0.87%) shall be paid to the State
Treasurer to be further apportioned as follows:
(1) thirty-six percent (36%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Promotion
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such
apportionment exceed the total amount apportioned
pursuant to this division for the fiscal year
ending on June 30, 2015, and
(2) sixty-four percent (64%) shall be placed to the
credit of the Oklahoma Tourism Capital
Improvement Revolving Fund, but in no event shall
such apportionment exceed the total amount
apportioned pursuant to this division for the
fiscal year ending on June 30, 2015, and
b. any amounts which exceed the limitations of
subparagraph a of this paragraph shall be placed to
the credit of the General Revenue Fund; and
5. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2015, and for each
fiscal year thereafter fiscal years 2016 through 2025, six one-
hundredths percent (0.06%) shall be placed to the credit of the
Oklahoma Historical Society Capital Improvement and Operations
Revolving Fund, but in no event shall such apportionment exceed the
total amount apportioned pursuant to this paragraph for the fiscal
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

year ending on June 30, 2015. For fiscal year 2026 and subsequent
fiscal years, six one-hundredths percent (0.06%) shall be placed to
the credit of the Oklahoma Historical Society Capital Improvement
and Operations Revolving Fund, but in no event shall the
apportionment exceed Three Hundred Seventy Thousand Two Hundred
Seventy-four Dollars and forty-three cents ($370,274.43). Any
amounts which exceed the limitations of this paragraph shall be
placed to the credit of the General Revenue Fund.
B. Prior to the apportionments otherwise provided in this
section, there shall be apportioned to the Education Reform
Revolving Fund of the State Department of Education the following
amounts in the following state fiscal years:
FY 2019 $19,600,000.00; and
FY 2020 and each year thereafter $20,500,000.00.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON REVENUE AND TAXATION
February 17, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB38 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)